North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 6. Equal Employment and Compensation Opportunity; Assisting in Obtaining State Employment.

§ 126-16.
Equal opportunity for employment and compensation by State departments and agencies and local political subdivisions.

All State agencies, departments, and institutions and all local political subdivisions of North Carolina shall give equal opportunity for employment and compensation, without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, disability, or genetic information to all persons otherwise qualified.

History.

1971, c. 823; 1975, c. 158; 1977, c. 866, s. 7; 1979, c. 862, s. 3; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1116, s. 111; 1985, c. 571, s. 2; 1991, c. 65, s. 6; 2013-382, s. 7.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 7.1, effective August 21, 2013, rewrote the section, which formerly read “All State departments and agencies and all local political subdivisions of North Carolina shall give equal opportunity for employment and compensation, without regard to race, religion, color, creed, national origin, sex, age, or handicapping condition as defined in

G.S. 168A-3

to all persons otherwise qualified, except where specific age, sex or physical requirements constitute bona fide occupational qualifications necessary to proper and efficient administration. This section with respect to equal opportunity as to age shall be limited to individuals who are at least 40 years of age.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “‘Hair’ Today, Gone Tomorrow: How Immutable Traits May Become the New Face of Discrimination as Interpreted in Equal Employment Opportunity Comm’n v. Catastrophe Mgmt. Sols.,” see 39 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 166 (2017).

§ 126-16.1.
Equal employment opportunity training.

Each State agency, department, and institution and The University of North Carolina shall enroll each newly appointed supervisor or manager within one year of appointment in the Equal Employment Opportunity training offered or approved by the Office of State Human Resources.

History.

1991, c. 416, s. 1; 2013-382, ss. 7.2, 9.1(c).

§ 126-17.
Retaliation by State departments and agencies and local political subdivisions.

No State department, agency, or local political subdivision of North Carolina shall retaliate against an employee for protesting alleged violations of

G.S. 126-16

.

History.

1977, c. 866, s. 8.

§ 126-18.
Compensation for assisting person in obtaining State employment barred; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to collect, accept or receive any compensation, consideration or thing of value for obtaining on behalf of any other person, or aiding or assisting any other person in obtaining employment with the State of North Carolina; provided, however, any person, firm, or corporation that is duly licensed and supervised by the North Carolina Department of Labor as a private employment service acting in the normal course of business, may collect such regular and customary fees for services rendered pursuant to a written contract when such fees are paid by someone other than the State of North Carolina; however, any person, firm, or corporation collecting fees for this service must have been licensed by the North Carolina Department of Labor for a period of not less than one year.

Any person, firm or corporation collecting fees for this service must make a monthly report to the Department of Labor listing the name of the person, firm or corporation collecting fees and the person for whom a job was found, the nature and purpose of the job obtained, and the fee collected by the person, firm or corporation collecting the fee. Violation of this section shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1977, c. 397, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 933; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A “Referral Incentive Award” program would not violate this section because it did not allow the referring state employee to receive any sort of compensation from any other source related to the referral and the program did not have any provision in it that would require or allow the State to pay any kind of fee that might be charged by a licensed referral source to the jobhunter. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Ronald G. Penny, State Personnel Director, 2000 N.C. AG LEXIS 10 (6/30/2000).

This section does not prohibit the State or one of its agencies from utilizing the services of a personnel agency or search firm to find candidates for a difficult-to-recruit position after other efforts to fill the position have failed; however, the statutorily mandated promotional priority for state employees under this section restricts and limits the ability of state agencies to act in this situation. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Richard V. Lee, State Personnel Director, 58 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 91 (1988).

§ 126-19.
Equal employment opportunity plans; reports; maintenance of services by Director of the Office of State Human Resources.

Each member of the Council of State under

G.S. 143A-11

, each of the principal departments enumerated in G.S. 143B-6, The University of North Carolina, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch, shall develop and submit on an annual basis an Equal Employment Opportunity plan which shall include goals and programs that provide positive measures to assure equitable and fair representation of North Carolina’s citizens. The plans developed by the judicial branch and by the Legislative Services Office on behalf of the legislative branch shall be submitted to the General Assembly on or before June 1 of each year. All other such plans shall be submitted to the Director of the Office of State Human Resources for review and approval on or before March 1, of each year.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-382, s. 7.3, effective August 21, 2013.

The Director of the Office of State Human Resources will provide services of Equal Employment Opportunity technical assistance, training, oversight, monitoring, evaluation, support programs, and reporting to assure that State government’s work force is diverse at all occupational levels. These services shall be provided by qualified personnel.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992) c. 919, ss. 2-4; 2013-382, ss. 7.3, 9.1(c).

§§ 126-20,
126-21.

Reserved for future codification purposes.